Utah statutes.
23-14-10.   Compensation of division employees -- Travel expenses of
director and employees.
Employees of the Division of Wildlife Resources shall receive such
compensation as the director shall determine within limits established for
state employees by the Division of Finance.   In addition to salaries provided
for within this title, the director and employees of the Division of Wildlife
Resources are entitled to receive travel expenses as provided in the rules
established by the Division of Finance.
